Maryland, session 2025, HB0320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–507.
(c) In Calvert County, Carroll County, Charles County, Harford County, [and]
Washington County, AND WICOMICO COUNTY, a person may not stand in a roadway,
median divider, or intersection to solicit money or donations of any kind from the occupant
of a vehicle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0320*

HOUSE BILL 320
21–507.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AGGRESSIVE MANNER” MEANS:
(1) INTENTIONALLY BLOCKING OR INTERFERING WITH THE SAFE OR
FREE PASSAGE OF A PEDESTRIAN OR VEHICLE BY ANY MEANS, INCLUDING BY
UNREASONABLY CAUSING A PEDESTRIAN OR DRIVER TO TAKE EVASIVE ACTION TO
AVOID PHYSICAL CONTACT; OR
(2) USING VIOLENT OR THREATENING GESTURES TOWARD AN
INDIVIDUAL.
(B) IN WICOMICO COUNTY, A PERSON MAY NOT STAND IN A ROADWAY,
MEDIAN DIVIDER, OR INTERSECTION TO SOLICIT IN AN AGGRESSIVE MANNER
MONEY OR DONATIONS OF ANY KIND FROM AN OCCUPANT OF A VEHICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.